es: Accesorio de cámara: Visor de ángulo; Visor de cubilete para el ojo; Adaptadores oculares; Visor LCD; Visor de lupa; Cubilete de goma para el ojo; Parasol; Otros
it: Fissaggio della fotocamera: Mirino angolare; Mirino oculare; Adattatore per oculari; Mirino LCD; Mirino di ingrandimento; Oculare in gomma; Cappa solari; Altro
bg-BG: Приставка за камера: Ъглов визьор; Визьор на окуляр; Адаптер за окуляр; LCD визьор; Увеличаващ визьор; Гумен окуляр; Сенник; Други
hr-HR: Dodatak za fotoaparat: Kutno tražilo; Okular tražila; Adapter za okular; LCD tražilo; Tražilo s povećalom; Gumeni okular; Štitnik za sunce; Ostalo
sk-SK: Nástavec na fotoaparát: Uhlový hľadáčik; Hľadáčik očnice; Adaptér okuláru; LCD hľadáčik; Zväčšovací hľadáčik; Gumová očnica; Kapucňa proti slnku; Iné
fi: Kameran liitososa: Kulmaetsin; Silmäkuppietsin; Okulaarisovitin; LCD-etsin; Suurentava etsin; Kuminen silmäkuppi; Aurinkosuoja; Muu
pt-BR: Acessório de câmera: Visor angular; Visor ocular; Adaptador de ocular; Visor LCD; Visor de ampliação; Ocular de borracha; Capa com proteção solar; Outro
lt-LT: Fotoaparato priedas: Kampinis vaizdo ieškiklis; Gaubtinis vaizdo ieškiklis; Okuliaro adapteris; LCD vaizdo ieškiklis; Didinamasis vaizdo ieškiklis; Guminis okuliaro gaubtas; Gaubtas nuo saulės; Kita
ru: Тип детали или аксессуара: Угловой видоискатель; Наглазник; Адаптер окуляра; ЖК-видоискатель; Увеличительный видоискатель; Резиновый наглазник; Козырек от солнца; Другое
ko: 카메라 부착: 앵글 뷰파인더; 아이컵 뷰파인더; 접안렌즈 어댑터; LCD 뷰파인더; 확대 뷰파인더; 고무 아이컵; 썬후드; 기타
cs: Upevnění fotoaparátu: Úhlový hledáček; Oční hledáček; Adaptér okuláru; LCD hledáček; Zvětšovací hledáček; Gumová očnice; Sluneční clona; Jiné
ja: カメラのアタッチメント: アングルビューファインダー; アイカップビューファインダー; アイピースアダプター; LCDビューファインダー; 拡大ビューファインダー; ゴム製アイカップ; サンフード; その他
zh-TW: 相機配件: 角度取景器; 目鏡取景器; 目鏡轉接器; 液晶顯示器取景器; 放大取景器; 橡膠眼罩; 遮光罩; 其他
pl: Mocowanie aparatu: Wizjer kątowy; Muszla oczna na wizjer; Adapter okularu; Wizjer LCD; Wizjer powiększający; Gumowa muszla oczna; Osłona przeciwsłoneczna; Inne
hu: Kamerakiegészítő: Szögkereső; Keresőre szerelhető szemkagyló; Szemlencseadapter; LCD kereső; Nagyító kereső; Gumi szemkagyló; Napellenző; Egyéb
el: Εξάρτημα κάμερας: Γωνιακό σκόπευτρο; Προσοφθάλμιο σκόπευτρο; Προσαρμογέας προσοφθάλμιου φακού; Σκόπευτρο LCD; Μεγεθυντικό σκόπευτρο; Προσοφθάλμιο από καουτσούκ; Κουκούλα για τον ήλιο; Άλλο
th: อุปกรณ์ติดกล้อง: ช่องมองภาพแบบตั้งฉาก; ที่รองตาช่องมองภาพ; อะแดปเตอร์เลนส์ใกล้ตา; จอ LCD ช่องมองภาพ; กล้องขยายช่องมองภาพ; ที่รองตาแบบยาง; ฮูดป้องกันแสงแดด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Acessório da câmara: Visor de ângulo; Visor de concha ocular; Adaptador ocular; Visor LCD; Visor com lupa; Concha ocular de borracha; Protetor do sol; Outro
en: Camera attachment: Angle viewfinder; Eyecup viewfinder; Eyepiece adapter; LCD viewfinder; Magnifying viewfinder; Rubber eyecup; Sun hood; Other
da: Kameratilbehør: Vinkelsøger; Øjenstykkesøger; Okularadapter; LCD-søger; Forstørrelsessøger; Gummiøjenstykke; Solhætte; Andet
nb: Kameratilbehør: Vinkelsøker; Øyemuslingssøker; Okularadapter; LCD-søker; Forstørrende søker; Øyemusling av gummi; Solhette; Annet
zh-CN: 相机附件: 斜角取景器; 眼罩取景器; 目镜接头; LCD 取景器; 放大取景器; 橡胶眼罩; 遮光罩; 其他
vi: Phụ tùng máy ảnh: Kính ngắm góc; Kính ngắm đệm mắt; Bộ chuyển đổi thị kính; Kính ngắm LCD; Kính ngắm phóng đại; Đệm mắt cao su; Mũ che nắng; Khác
de: Kamerabefestigung: Winkelsucher; Sucher mit Augenmuschel; Okularadapter; LCD-Sucher; Vergrößernder Sucher; Augenmuschel aus Gummi; Sonnenhaube; Sonstiges
fr: Fixation de l’appareil photo: Viseur d’angle; Œilleton; Adaptateur d’oculaire; Viseur LCD; Viseur grossissant; Œilleton en caoutchouc; Capote pare-soleil; Autre
sl-SI: Nastavek za fotoaparat: Kotno iskalo; Iskalo okularja; Adapter za okular; LCD iskalo; Povečevalno iskalo; Gumijast okular; Kapuca proti soncu; Drugo
tr: Kamera eklentisi: Açılı vizör; Adaptörlü vizör; Mercek adaptörü; LCD vizör; Büyütücü vizörü; Kauçuk vizör lastiği; Güneşlik; Diğer
nl: Camerabevestiging: Hoekzoeker; Oogdopzoeker; Oculaire adapter; LCD-zoeker; Vergrotende zoeker; Rubberen oogdop; Zonnekap; Andere
ro-RO: Accesoriu aparat foto: Vizor unghiular; Vizor ocular; Adaptor pentru ocular; Vizor LCD; Vizor de mărire; Ocular din cauciuc; Protecție solară; Altele
sv: Kamerafäste: Vinkelsökare; Sökare med ögonmussla; Okularadapter; LCD-sökare; Förstorande sökare; Gummiögonmussla; Solskydd; Övrigt